Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325E.0685] TABLE SAWS; SAFETY REQUIREMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Entity" means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or other organization authorized to transact business in Minnesota. Entity does not include any state or local government unit. new text end new text begin (c) "Table saw" means a woodworking tool that has a motor-driven circular saw blade that protrudes through the surface of a table and is powered by alternating current from a wall outlet. Table saw includes but is not limited to a bench, job site, contractor, hybrid, cabinet, or sliding saw. new text end new text begin (d) "Test probe" means a device that enables the accurate measurement of the depth of a cut. Test probe does not include a finger or other human body part. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin (a) An entity must not import, manufacture, sell, or offer for sale a table saw that the entity knows or has reason to know does not meet the requirements under paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (b) The maximum depth a table saw is capable of cutting for a test probe must not exceed 3.5 millimeters when the table saw: new text end new text begin (1) is powered on; new text end new text begin (2) has the center axis of a test probe moving parallel to, with a tolerance of 13 millimeters to 17 millimeters, above the tabletop at a rate of one meter per second; and new text end new text begin (3) has the test probe contact a spinning saw blade that is set at the maximum height setting. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin An entity does not violate this section if the entity is unable to obtain, on fair, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory terms, a license under a patent required to comply with subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Enforcement. new text end new text begin An entity that violates this section is subject to the penalties and remedies, including a private right of action to recover damages, as provided in section 8.31. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end